Vermont, session 2025-2026, H170.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 16 V.S.A. § 2286 is added to read:
§ 2286. ENROLLMENT CAP
(a) The City of Burlington, in collaboration with the University of Vermont
and State Agricultural College, shall contract for the publication of an annual
citywide housing vacancy rate in accordance with U.S. generally accepted
auditing standards. The rate shall be published annually on or before July 31.
(b) Whenever the housing vacancy rate for the City of Burlington is less
than five percent as published by subsection (a) of this section, the University
of Vermont and State Agricultural College shall limit the number of students
enrolled in the school to its enrollment number as of the end of the fall
semester concluding immediately after the publication of the housing vacancy
rate.
Sec. 2. 16 V.S.A. § 2287 is added to read:
§ 2287. RESIDENTIAL HOUSING REQUIREMENTS; ANNUAL
REPORT; UVM HOUSING TASK FORCE
(a) The University of Vermont and State Agricultural College shall ensure
that all university-owned or affiliated housing complies with:
(1) minimal standards for dwellings adopted by ordinance under 24
V.S.A. chapter 123 (municipal housing codes) by the municipality where the
housing is located; and
VT LEG #379962 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.170
2025 Page 3 of 6
(2) 20 V.S.A. chapter 172 (rental housing health and safety).
(b)(1) The standards identified in subsection (a) of this section shall apply
to all residential buildings in use on July 1, 2025 as well as all new
construction and existing buildings repurposed for housing on or after July 1,
2025.
(2) The University of Vermont and State Agricultural College shall
make reasonable efforts to ensure all housing complies with this section as
soon as practicable.
(3) Current students living in on-campus housing not meeting the
requirements of subsection (a) of this section shall be offered housing that
meets the requirements of this section prior to the same housing being offered
to new students.
(4) Space designed to house two students that does not meet the
requirements of this section shall be offered to students with documented
medical accommodation needs for a single room.
(c)(1) On or before January 15 of each year, the University of Vermont and
State Agricultural College shall submit to the General Assembly an annual
housing impact report.
(2) The report shall include:
(A) a summary of compliance with the requirements of subsections
(a) and (b) of this section, including:
VT LEG #379962 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.170
2025 Page 4 of 6
(i) a detailed listing of housing not in compliance with this section
with the number and types of compliance violations; and
(ii) the number of housing units and the number of students
affected;
(B) an analysis of the on-campus and affiliated housing capacity of
the University;
(C) student enrollment numbers, including the number of students
residing in off-campus housing by municipality;
(D) any current plans for future housing developments; and
(E) steps taken to bring housing into compliance with the
requirements of this section.
(3) The provisions of 2 V.S.A. § 20(d) (expiration of required reports)
shall not apply to the report required under this subsection.
(d)(1) There is established the UVM Housing Task Force to monitor
compliance with this section. The Task Force shall be overseen by the State
Auditor and shall be composed of the following members:
(A) the State Auditor or designee;
(B) a current member of the House of Representatives, who shall be
appointed by the Speaker of the House;
(C) a current member of the Senate, who shall be appointed by the
Committee on Committees;
VT LEG #379962 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.170
2025 Page 5 of 6
(D) the Mayor of Burlington or designee;
(E) two members of the Board of Trustees of the University of
Vermont and State Agricultural College, appointed by the Chair of the Board
of Trustees, one of whom shall be a student; and
(F) one Burlington city councilor appointed by the City Council
President.
(2) The State Auditor shall serve as Chair of the Task Force and shall
ensure the Task Force meets at least biannually.
(3) The Task Force shall:
(A) review activities of, and recommend actions for, the City of
Burlington and the University of Vermont and State Agricultural College to
relieve housing pressures in the City of Burlington associated with the
enrollment of students;
(B) review and recommend amendments to agreements between the
City and the University regarding housing; and
(C) recommend potential legislative changes to ensure compliance
with this section.
(4) The Task Force shall report annually on or before January 31 of each
year to the General Assembly regarding activities undertaken by the Task
Force with any recommendations for legislative action. The provisions of 2
VT LEG #379962 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.170
2025 Page 6 of 6
V.S.A. § 20(d) (expiration of required reports) shall not apply to the report
required under this subsection.
(5) For attendance at meetings during adjournment of the General
Assembly, a legislative member of the Task Force shall be entitled to per diem
compensation and reimbursement of expenses pursuant to 2 V.S.A. § 23.
These payments shall be made from monies appropriated to the General
Assembly.
(e) Housing agreements between the City of Burlington and the University
of Vermont and State Agricultural College shall include enforceable
commitments to:
(1) build new housing that complies with municipal ordinances around
minimal standards for dwellings; and
(2) align housing development with the City of Burlington’s broader
housing strategies.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #379962 v.1